Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 19.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-1614
Life insurance; extension to spouse and children of employee or member; limitation.

Insurance under any group life insurance policy issued pursuant to section 44-1602, 44-1604, 44-1605, 44-1606, 44-1606.01, 44-1606.02, or 44-1606.03 may be extended to insure the employees or members against loss due to the death of their spouses and dependent children, or any class or classes thereof. Premiums for the insurance shall be paid either from funds contributed by the employer, the labor union or similar employee organization, or other person to whom the policy has been issued or from funds contributed by the covered persons, or from both. A policy on which no part of the premium for the spouse's and dependent child's coverage is to be derived from funds contributed by the covered persons shall insure all eligible employees or members with respect to their spouses and dependent children, or any class or classes of employees or members or all except any as to whom evidence of individual insurability is not satisfactory to the insurer. The amount of insurance for any covered spouse or dependent child under the policy may not exceed fifty percent of the amount of insurance for which the employee or member is insured.

Laws 1957, c. 192, § 9, p. 681;

Laws 1961, c. 224, § 1, p. 666;

Laws 1972, LB 1189, § 2;

Laws 1989, LB 92, § 179;

Laws 2008, LB855, § 19.

Where policy issued was not life policy but accident policy, insurer could deny certain coverage to wife of member. Simmons v. Continental Cas. Co., 410 F.2d 881 (8th Cir. 1969).